Hawaii statutes.
[§672E-2 Applicability.] All claimants
filing an action alleging construction defects shall comply with this chapter;
provided that this chapter shall not apply to any actions that include claims
for personal injury or death. [L 2004, c 119, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next